Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; OFFICE OF THE FOSTER YOUTH OMBUDSPERSON.new text end new text begin $240,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $240,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Office of the Foster Youth Ombudsperson for additional full-time employees to conduct outreach to foster youth. new text end